Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1129.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2132a. (1) An insurer that issues a home insurance policy that is required to submit rates and rating plans to the director under this chapter shall provide an actuarially justified premium discount or any other adjustment to reduce the insurance premium to any insureds who build or retrofit a property. To obtain this discount or adjustment, the property must meet both the following: (a) The physical condition of the property is such that the property would otherwise be eligible for home insurance coverage under this chapter. (b) Any fortified roof standards created by IBHS or standard established by a successor entity as determined by the director. (2) To obtain a discount or adjustment under this section, the property must be certified as constructed in accordance with the IBHS standard or the standards of a successor entity determined by the director. (3) To obtain this certification, the property must be inspected and certified by an IBHS certified evaluator. (4) To obtain a discount or adjustment under this section, the insured must present the IBHS certificate to the insurer of the property. (5) This section does not prohibit an insurer from offering additional discounts or adjustments as permitted under this act. (6) This section only applies to insurance policies issued or renewed after December 31, 2027. (7) As used in this section: (a) "Fortified" means the trademark owned by the Insurance Institute for Business and Home Safety. (b) "Fortified roof" means the trademark owned by the Insurance Institute for Business and Home Safety. (c) "IBHS" means the Insurance Institute for Business and Home Safety. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. ____ (request no. H07605'26). (b) House Bill No. ____ (request no. H07607'26).